Wisconsin, session 2025, SB80.
do enact as follows:SB80,11Section 1. Chapter 798 of the statutes is created to read:SB80,2,32CHAPTER 7983SPECIALTY COURTSSB80,2,44798.01 Legislative findings. The legislature finds all of the following:SB80,3,65(1) Specialized dockets for treatment courts and for commercial cases have 6existed in this state and across the country for a number of years in recognition of 1the fact that the interests of justice in general, and of litigants in particular, are 2substantially enhanced when judges and other court personnel commit to take 3specific training in the subject matter areas of a particular specialized docket and 4then apply that training and expertise to the unique issues before the court. The 5use of specialized dockets increases efficiencies and improve outcomes in the 6handling of these cases.SB80,3,107(2) The commercial court docket has existed in this state for over 7 years as a 8pilot project in a number of counties and judicial districts and has been shown to 9reduce substantially the time it takes to obtain a decision and increase the level of 10satisfaction of the parties with the results in commercial disputes.SB80,3,1811798.05 Treatment court dockets. (1) Purpose; authority. The purpose 12of this section is to statutorily recognize specialized dockets for treatment courts. 13Treatment courts are designed to operate within the framework of the existing state 14court system and specifically address underlying issues relating to criminal 15behavior. Treatment courts provide treatment while working with a 16multidisciplinary team to deploy a range of graduated rewards and sanctions with 17the goal of engaging participants in treatment long enough to successfully address 18any addiction or mental health issues and end the cycle of recidivism.SB80,3,2019(2) Definition. In this section, “treatment court” includes all of the 20following:SB80,3,2121(a) Adult drug treatment court.SB80,3,2222(b) Juvenile drug treatment court.SB80,3,2323(c) Operating while intoxicated treatment court.SB80,4,11(d) Mental health treatment court.SB80,4,22(e) Family dependency treatment court.SB80,4,33(f) Veterans treatment court.SB80,4,44(g) Hybrid treatment court.SB80,4,55(h) Tribal healing to wellness court.SB80,4,126798.15 Commercial court docket. (1) Purpose; authority. The purpose 7of this section is to statutorily recognize a specialized docket for commercial cases in 8state circuit courts. The commercial court docket is designed to operate within the 9framework of the existing state court system with minimal impact on the balance of 10court operations. It is intended to leverage judicial expertise in commercial law and 11disputes with commercial litigants’ desire to tailor case management practices best 12suited for resolving substantial business disputes fairly and expeditiously.SB80,4,1313(2) Definitions. In this section:SB80,4,1914(a) “Business organization” includes a sole proprietorship, corporation, 15partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, professional 16association, benefits corporation, service corporation, joint venture, bank, savings 17bank, savings and loan association, or business trust. A “business organization” 18excludes an individual, a family trust, or a political subdivision or governmental 19entity.SB80,4,2120(b) “Consumer contract or transaction” means a consumer contract or 21transaction that is primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.SB80,5,522(3) Scope. (a) The commercial court procedures outlined in this section 23apply to judicial administrative districts that have established specialized dockets 1for commercial cases on the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], 2and to any commercial court docket established after the effective date of this 3paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], beginning on the date that docket is established. 4Courts with specialized dockets for commercial cases shall be referred to as the 5“commercial court.”SB80,5,116(b) 1. The chief justice of the supreme court, after considering the 7recommendation of the chief judge of the encompassing judicial administrative 8district, shall select the circuit court judges in the judicial administrative districts 9who will be assigned to the commercial court docket upon each judge’s agreement to 10so serve. The chief justice of the supreme court shall select at least all of the 11following to participate in the commercial court under this section:SB80,5,1312a. No fewer than 4 circuit court judges within the 2nd judicial administrative 13district.SB80,5,1514b. No fewer than 4 circuit court judges within the 3rd judicial administrative 15district.SB80,5,1716c. No fewer than 4 circuit court judges within the 5th judicial administrative 17district.SB80,5,1918d. No fewer than 4 circuit court judges within the 8th judicial administrative 19district.SB80,5,2120e. No fewer than 4 circuit court judges within the 10th judicial administrative 21district.SB80,5,2322f. No fewer than 4 circuit court judges within any judicial administrative 23district that adds a commercial court docket.SB80,6,212. A judge who presides in a commercial court docket is not prohibited from 2working on any other assigned docket.SB80,6,533. The chief justice of the supreme court may add additional judicial 4administrative districts to the commercial court docket upon the recommendation 5of the director of state courts.SB80,6,96(4) Mandatory assignment of cases to the commercial court docket. 7(a) Any case of a type described under par. (b) that is filed in a circuit court in which 8a commercial court docket has been established shall be assigned to the commercial 9court docket as provided under sub. (7).SB80,6,1110(b) The commercial court shall have jurisdiction over all of the following types 11of cases:SB80,6,13121. Cases involving the governance or internal affairs of business 13organizations, including all of the following:SB80,6,1514a. Claims between or among owners or constituents of a business 15organization.SB80,6,1616b. Claims against officers, directors, or managers of a business organization.SB80,6,1817c. Claims involving the indemnity of owners, officers, directors, or managers 18of a business organization.SB80,6,2119d. Claims involving the interpretation of the rights and obligations under the 20law governing business organizations, such as chs. 178 to 181, 183, 185, 204, 214, 21215, and 221 to 223, or any similar statute or law from another jurisdiction.SB80,7,222e. Claims involving the interpretation of the rights and obligations under any 23agreement governing a business organization, such as the articles of incorporation, 1bylaws, operating agreements, membership agreements, or partnership agreement 2of the business organization.SB80,7,432. Cases involving tortious or statutorily prohibited business activity, unfair 4competition, or antitrust, including all of the following:SB80,7,55a. Claims under ch. 133.SB80,7,66b. Claims under s. 100.30 (5m) or (5r).SB80,7,77c. Claims under s. 134.01.SB80,7,88d. Claims of tortious interference with a business organization. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb80 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb80 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB80 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB80 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB80: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting